Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-173
Terms, defined.

For
purposes of the Deferred Building Renewal Act and sections 85-106 and 85-304,
unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Renewal work means any (a) deferred or preventive maintenance projects
that will restore facilities and utility systems as closely as practicable
to their original constructed condition as defined by the Task Force for Building
Renewal, (b) projects that will bring facilities into compliance with current
fire safety, life safety, and hazardous materials abatement requirements,
and (c) projects that will bring facilities into compliance with the federal
Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990. The standard of quality maintenance
shall be set after consideration of the facility users, geographical location,
condition, and physical analysis of each building;

(2) Deferred maintenance means any measures taken to: (a) Correct or
repair structural or mechanical defects that would endanger the integrity
of a building or its components or allow unwanted penetration of the building
by the outdoor elements; (b) correct or repair structural, mechanical, or
other defects in a building or its components or utility systems which endanger
the lives or health of state employees or the general public; (c) bring a
building into compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act
of 1990; (d)
correct a waste of energy, including minor repairs, alteration and maintenance
painting, cost of materials, hiring of building maintenance personnel, and
other necessary expenses for the maintenance of roofs, exterior walls, retaining
walls, foundations, flooring, ceilings, partitions, doors, building hardware,
windows, plaster, structural ironwork, screens, plumbing, heating, air-handling,
and air conditioning equipment, or electrical systems, but excluding decorative
finish or furnishing or building additions; or
(e) conduct an energy audit;

(3) Preventive maintenance means any measures taken to maintain the
structural or mechanical integrity of a building or its components including
those measures listed in subdivision (2) of this section; and

(4) Task force means the Task Force for Building Renewal.

Laws 1977, LB 309, § 1;

Laws 1980, LB 835, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 604, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 369, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1100, § 14;

Laws 1998, LB 1129, § 15;

Laws 2011, LB228, § 1.